Utah statutes.
57-8-25.   Joint and several liability of grantor and grantee for unpaid common expenses.

In a voluntary conveyance, the grantee of a unit shall be jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the latter for his share of the common expenses up to the time of the grant or conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's rights to recover from the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee. However, any such grantee shall be entitled to a statement from the manager or management committee setting forth the amounts of the unpaid assessments against the grantor, and such grantee shall not be liable for, nor shall the unit conveyed be subject to a lien for, any unpaid assessments against the grantor in excess of the amount set forth.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 1963 General Session

